Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,125
Excluded transactions.

(MBCA 9.01) Sections 21-2,125
to 21-2,149 may not be used to effect a transaction that converts an insurance
company organized on the mutual principle to one organized on a stock-share
basis.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 125.